California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(g) (1) Within 60 days of federal approval of the single rate structure utilizing the alternative methodology in the state plan, the department, in collaboration with the State Department of Education, shall provide the Assembly Committee on Budget, the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office with a report that outlines the implementation components for the approved single rate structure. For a period of 30 days, the Legislature shall have the opportunity to review and provide feedback regarding draft guidance for implementation of
 policies. The report shall include all of the following:

(A) The department’s plan to set new reimbursement rates under the alternative methodology by no later than July 1, 2025.

(B) The estimated costs and estimated timelines associated with the implementation components of the approved single rate structure, including, but not limited to, state operations resources, technology and infrastructure changes, and any regulatory or statutory changes necessary to implement the approved single rate structure.

(2) (A) The department shall, from October 1, 2024, to July 1, 2028, inclusive, provide the Assembly Committee on Budget, the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office with quarterly updates on the implementation of the new reimbursement rates set under the alternative methodology. The quarterly updates shall include any changes to the information provided in the report described in paragraph (1).

(B) (i) The quarterly report issued in July 2027, pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall consist of the considerations required to add monthly cost of care plus rates made pursuant to Sections 10277.1, 10277.2, and 10277.6 to existing reimbursement rates that are funded within existing childcare and
 development contracts for alternative payment programs, including, but not limited to, migrant alternative payment programs pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10225), migrant childcare and development programs pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 10235), general childcare and development programs pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10240), family childcare home education networks pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 10250), childcare and development services for children with special needs pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10260), childcare for recipients of the CalWORKs program pursuant to Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370), and the emergency childcare bridge program for foster children pursuant to Section 11461.6.

(ii) Considerations presented by the department pursuant to
 clause (i) shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(I) Updates to data systems required to add monthly cost of care plus payments to existing contract rates.

(II) Necessary statutory and regulatory changes to add monthly cost of care plus payments to existing contract rates.

(III) Activities needed to be performed by the department and contractors to ensure contractors can pay childcare providers through a contract rate that includes the monthly cost of care plus payments.

(iii) The department shall present, where practicable, an estimated timeframe for each consideration described pursuant to clause (ii).

(h) Beginning October 1, 2025, and through July 1, 2027, inclusive, the department shall update the Legislature not more frequently than quarterly, to the extent information is available or reported to the department by contractors, regarding progress on implementation of paying based on enrollment.

(i) The Governor and the Legislature shall, by no later than July 1, 2025, establish reimbursement rates based on the alternative methodology. Provider reimbursement rates shall not be reduced from the reimbursement rates that were in effect on June 30, 2024, pursuant to Sections 10280 and 10374.5 of this code and Section 8242 of the Education Code, inclusive of the cost of care plus rates established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10277.1 and
 subdivision (b) of Section 10277.2.

(j) (1) If the new reimbursement rates established pursuant to subdivision(i) do not take effect on July 1, 2025, the department shall provide the Legislature with a timeline for transitioning from the rates that are in effect on July 1, 2025, to the new rates established pursuant to subdivision (i).

(2) Any temporary reimbursement rates established as part of the transition timeline required by paragraph (1) shall be, at minimum, equivalent to the reimbursement rates established pursuant to Sections 10280 and 10374.5 of this code and Section 8242 of the Education Code, inclusive of the cost of care plus rates established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10277.1 and subdivision (b) of Section 10277.2.

(k) The single rate structure shall apply to all
 programs funded by the State Department of Social Services under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10225), Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 10235), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10240), Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 10250), Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10260), Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370), and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11461.6) of Part 2, and the State Department of Education under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code.

(l) The department, after collaborating with the State Department of Education, shall identify the remaining foundational policy frameworks of the single rate structure by January 10, 2028.

(m) (1) Except as required by subdivision (n), it is the intent of the Legislature, beginning July 1, 2025, to cease using a regional market rate survey pursuant to Section 10436, and instead use an alternative methodology, as defined in subdivision (ak) of Section 10213.5, for the purpose of informing the setting of future childcare rates and California state preschool program rates.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(A) Reimbursement
 rates are set pursuant to statute and informed by the alternative methodology, as defined in subdivision (ak) of Section 10213.5.

(B) Under the single rate structure, all programs described in subdivision (k) shall be reimbursed under a unified structure that takes into account a common set of rate elements.

(C) Rate levels shall be informed by the costs associated with meeting health and safety requirements and program requirements.

(D) Base rates shall be administered as a per-child amount, and programs shall be able to claim reimbursement for services they deliver consistent with enhanced rates, if any.

(E) Rates shall vary based on all of the following:

(i) Geography.

(ii) Type of care setting.

(iii) Regulatory and statutory requirements applicable to each type of care setting.

(iv) Time categories.

(v) Child age groupings, consisting of all of the following:

(I) Children under two years of age, the care of whom will be reimbursed at the infant rate.

(II) Children who are two years of age, the care of whom will be reimbursed at the toddler rate.

(III) Children who are three years of age to six years of age, inclusive, who are not yet enrolled in first grade, the
 care of whom will be reimbursed at the preschool rate.

(IV) Children five years of age and older, who are enrolled in first grade or higher, the care of whom will be reimbursed at the schoolage rate.

(F) (i) Enhanced inclusion rates shall be administered as a per-child amount, and programs shall be able to claim reimbursement, consistent with the rules and regulations developed by the department and the State Department of Education, respectively. To receive an enhanced inclusion rate for a child, the family data file shall include documentation of at least one of the following:

(I) A current individualized family service plan.

(II) A current individualized education program.

(III) A current individual program plan.

(IV) An active plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794).

(V) An active
 incidental medical services plan, as described in Section 1596.802 of the Health and Safety Code.

(ii) The documentation described in clause (i) may be unsigned if the family did not consent to the services, despite the child being deemed eligible.

(3) It is further the intent of the Legislature that the alternative methodology shall be based on a cost study and cost estimation model conducted by the department for the measurement of the costs of care in California for all childcare and preschool programs described in subdivision (k), and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following costs:

(A) Salaries and wages.

(B) Geography.

(C) Type of care setting.

(D) Regulatory and statutory requirements applicable to each type of care setting.

(E) Time categories, including, but not limited to, non-traditional hours.

(F) Child age.

(G) Cost for delivering inclusion supports.

(n) Commencing July 1, 2026, rates for all programs described in subdivision (k) shall receive the cost-of-living adjustment granted by the Legislature annually pursuant to Section 42238.15 of the Education Code as a minimum annual rate increase for all subsidized childcare providers.

(o) If the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Administration for Children and Families does not approve the alternative methodology developed pursuant to this section, the department shall develop and conduct a survey of the market rates for childcare services.

(p) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Section 10426, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 257, Sec. 18.   (AB 190)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10228.

If the market rate survey is used to set reimbursement rates, the following shall apply:

(a) Payments made by alternative payment programs shall not exceed the applicable market rate ceiling. Alternative payment programs may expend more than the standard reimbursement rate for a particular child. However, the aggregate payments for services purchased by the agency during the contract year shall not exceed the assigned reimbursable amount as established by the contract for the year. No agency may make payments in excess of the rate charged to full-cost families. This section does not preclude alternative payment programs from using the average daily enrollment adjustment factor
 for children with exceptional needs as provided in Section 10281.5.

(b) Alternative payment programs shall reimburse licensed childcare providers in accordance with a biennial market rate survey pursuant to Section 10436, at a rate not to exceed the ceilings established pursuant to Section 10374.5.

(c) An alternative payment program shall reimburse a licensed provider for childcare of a subsidized child based on the rate charged by the provider to nonsubsidized families, if any, for the same services, or the rates established by the provider for prospective nonsubsidized families. A licensed childcare provider shall submit to the alternative payment program a copy of the provider’s rate sheet listing the rates charged, and the provider’s discount or scholarship policies, if any, along with a statement signed by the provider confirming that the rates charged for a subsidized child are equal to or less than the rates charged for a nonsubsidized child. A license-exempt childcare provider is not required to submit rate sheets.

(d) An alternative payment program shall maintain a copy of the rate sheet and the confirmation statement.

(e) A licensed childcare provider shall submit to the local resource and referral agency a copy of the provider’s rate sheet listing rates charged, and the provider’s discount or scholarship policies, if any, and shall self-certify that the information is correct.

(f) Each licensed childcare provider may alter rate levels for subsidized children, as needed, and shall provide the alternative payment program and resource and referral agency with the updated information pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (e), to reflect any changes. Updated rates shall be effective within 60 days of submission of the updated information pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (e).

(g) A licensed childcare provider shall post in a prominent location adjacent to the provider’s license at the childcare facility the provider’s rates and discounts or scholarship policies, if any.

(h) An alternative payment program shall verify provider rates no less frequently than once a year by randomly selecting 10 percent of licensed childcare providers serving subsidized families. The purpose of this verification process is to confirm that rates reported to the alternative payment programs reasonably correspond to those reported to the resource and referral agency and the rates actually charged to nonsubsidized families for equivalent levels of services. It is the intent of the Legislature that the privacy of nonsubsidized families shall be protected in implementing this subdivision.

(i) The department shall develop regulations for addressing discrepancies in the provider rate levels identified through the rate verification process in subdivision (h).

(j) If a childcare provider’s reimbursement rate category could be construed as either full-time weekly or full-time monthly pursuant to Section 18075 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, the alternative payment program, county, or contractor shall reimburse the provider in accordance with either of the following:

(1) The applicable rate category that most closely corresponds to the rate category listed on the licensed childcare provider’s rate sheet.

(2) If the alternative payment program, county, or contractor cannot determine a single applicable rate category from the licensed childcare provider’s rate sheet, or if the license-exempt
 childcare provider does not have a rate sheet on file, the applicable rate category that results in the higher reimbursement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 41, Sec. 12.   (AB 116)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10228.1.

Out of funds appropriated in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 10214 for alternative payment programs, the department shall reallocate funds as necessary to reimburse alternative payment programs, excluding programs operating pursuant to Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370), for actual and allowable costs incurred for additional services. An alternative payment program may apply for reimbursement of up to 3 percent of the contract amount, or for a greater amount subject to the discretion of the department based on the availability of funds. The department shall approve or deny applications submitted pursuant to this section, but shall not consider applications received after September 30 of the current calendar year. The department shall distribute reimbursement funds for each approved
 application within 90 days of receipt of the application if it was filed between May 1 and July 20, inclusive, of the current calendar year. Applications received after July 20 are not subject to the 90-day requirement for the distribution of funds. If requests for reimbursement pursuant to this section exceed available funds, the department shall assign priority for reimbursement according to the order in which it receives applications. Funds received by an alternative payment program pursuant to this section that are not substantiated by the program’s annual audit shall be returned to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10229.

The reimbursement for alternative payment programs shall include the cost of child care paid to child care providers plus the administrative and support services costs of the alternative payment program. The total cost for administration and support services shall not exceed an amount equal to 17.5 percent of the total contract amount. The administrative costs shall not exceed the costs allowable for administration under federal requirements, and shall include, but not be limited to, costs associated with the dissemination of information on developmental screenings, including information on existing resources and a description of how a family or eligible child care
 provider may utilize those resources to obtain developmental screenings, as described in Section 9858c of the Title 42 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1016, Sec. 1.   (SB 1112)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10229.4.

If the market rate survey is used to set reimbursement rates, the following shall apply:

(a) Payments made by the Migrant Alternative Payment Program shall not exceed the applicable market rate ceiling.

(b) The reimbursement for the Migrant Alternative Payment Program shall include the cost of childcare paid to childcare providers plus the administrative and support services costs of the Migrant Alternative Payment Program. The total cost for administration and support services shall not exceed an amount equal to 21 percent of the total contract amount. The administrative costs shall not exceed the costs
 allowable for administration under federal requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 41, Sec. 13.   (AB 116)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10229.5.

The audits for such agencies shall include, but not be limited to, a sampling of the evidence of fees charged to, and paid by, families of nonsubsidized children, the daily enrollment of subsidized children, the number of days of service provided to subsidized children, the assessment and collection of parent fees, and the availability of support services to subsidized children and their families as needed pursuant to the terms of the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10230.

When making referrals, every agency operating both a direct service program and an alternative payment program shall provide at least four referrals, at least one of which shall be a provider over which the agency has no fiscal or operational control, as well as information to a family on the family’s ability to choose a license exempt provider.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10230.5.

(a) When making referrals, every program operating pursuant to this chapter shall provide information to any person who requests a child care referral of their right to view the licensing information of a licensed child day care facility required to be maintained at the facility pursuant to Section 1596.859 of the Health and Safety Code and to access any public files pertaining to the facility that are maintained by the department’s Community Care Licensing Division.

(b) A written or oral advisement in substantially the following form will comply with the requirements of subdivision (a):

“State law requires licensed child day care facilities to make accessible to the public a copy of any
 licensing report pertaining to the facility that documents a facility visit or a substantiated complaint investigation. In addition, a more complete file regarding a child care licensee may be available at an office of the State Department of Social Services’ Community Care Licensing Division. You have the right to access any public information in these files.”

(c) Every program operating pursuant to this chapter shall, within two days of receiving notice, remove from the program’s referral list the name of any licensed child day care facility with a revocation or a temporary suspension order or that is on probation.

(d) A program operating pursuant to this chapter shall, within two business days of being notified of a revocation or a temporary suspension order for a licensed child day care facility, do both of the following:

(1) Terminate payment to the facility.

(2) Notify each parent and the facility in writing that payment has been terminated and the reason for the termination.

(e) A program operating pursuant to this chapter shall, upon being notified that a licensed child day care facility has been placed on probation, provide written notice to each parent utilizing the facility that the facility has been placed on probation and that the parent has the option of selecting a different child day care provider or remaining with the facility without risk of subsidy payments to the provider being terminated. The Legislature urges each agency operating pursuant to this section to provide the written notice required by this subdivision in the primary language of the parent, to the extent feasible.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10231.

(a) To the extent that funding is made available for this purpose through the annual Budget Act, the alternative payment agency in each county shall design, maintain, and administer a system to consolidate local child care waiting lists so as to establish a countywide centralized eligibility list. In those counties with more than one alternative payment agency, the agency that also administers the resource and referral program shall have the responsibility of developing, maintaining, and administering the countywide centralized eligibility list. In those counties with more than one alternative payment agency and more than one resource and referral program, the department shall establish a process to select the agency to develop, maintain, and administer the countywide centralized eligibility list.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in those counties in which a countywide centralized eligibility list exists the entity administering that list may receive funding, instead of the entity specified under subdivision (a).

(c) Each centralized eligibility list shall include all of the following:

(1) Family characteristics, including ZIP Code of residence, ZIP Code of employment, monthly income, and size.

(2) Child characteristics, including birth date and whether the child has special needs.

(3) Service characteristics, including reason for need, whether full-time or part-time service is requested, and whether after hours or weekend care is requested.

(d) Information collected for the centralized eligibility list shall be reported to the department on an annual basis on the date and in the manner determined by the department.

(e) (1) To be eligible to enter into an agreement with the department to provide subsidized child care, a contractor shall participate in and use the centralized eligibility list.

(2) A contractor with a campus child care and development program operating pursuant to Section 66060 of the Education Code, migrant child care and development program operating on a seasonal basis pursuant to Section 10235, or program serving children with severe disabilities pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 10260 and who has a local site waiting list shall submit eligibility list information to the centralized eligibility list
 administrator for any parent seeking subsidized child care for whom these programs are not able to provide child care and development services. A child care and development contractor or program described in this paragraph may utilize any waiting lists developed at its local site to fill vacancies for its specific population. Families enrolled from a local site waiting list shall be enrolled pursuant to Section 10271.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10231.5.

(a) (1) On or before July 1, 2019, an alternative payment program shall establish a program of electronic banking for payments made to licensed or license-exempt child care providers that have a contract with that alternative payment program, including, but not limited to, direct deposit. A child care provider may choose to receive payments via electronic banking at the child care provider’s option. The child care provider may, but is not required to, authorize payment to be directly deposited by an electronic fund transfer into the child care provider’s account at the financial institution of their choice.

(2) Nothing in this subdivision shall preclude an alternative payment program that has an electronic banking
 program in place before the effective date of this subdivision from continuing to require a child care provider, including child care centers and family child care homes, to accept direct deposit or another form of electronic payment after the effective date of this subdivision.

(b) An alternative payment program shall include a description of the payment to the child care provider, by child served and month of service covered by the payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10232.

(a) Alternative payment programs and providers operating or providing services pursuant to this chapter may maintain records electronically, in compliance with state and federal standards, as determined by the department. Any conversion from a paper record to an electronic format, as well as the storage of the electronic record, shall comply with the minimum standards described in Section 12168.7 of the Government Code and the standards for trustworthy electronic document or record preservation described in Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 22620.1) of Division 7 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) The records shall be retained by each contractor for at least five years, or, where an audit has been requested by a state
 agency, until the date the audit is resolved, whichever is longer.

(c) This section does not require an alternative payment program or provider to create records electronically.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10232.5.

Alternative payment programs and providers operating or providing services pursuant to this chapter may use a digital signature that complies with state and federal standards, as determined by the department, that may be a marking that is either computer generated or produced by electronic means and is intended by the signatory to have the same effect as a handwritten signature. The use of a digital signature shall have the same force and effect as the use of a manual signature if the requirements for digital signatures and their acceptable technology, as provided in Section 16.5 of the Government Code and in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 22000) of Division 7 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations, are satisfied.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10233.

Alternative payment programs and providers operating or providing services pursuant to this chapter may use digital forms to allow families to apply for services, if those forms comply with state and federal standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10234.

An alternative payment agency, including, but not limited to, an alternative payment agency for migrant child care and development programs established pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 10235), shall provide to the department, on a monthly basis, data about child care caseload in the alternative payment program established pursuant to this chapter and migrant child care and development programs established pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 10235). This data shall include county-by-county caseload, expenditures, unit costs, family fees, and other key variables requested by the department to determine any additional state allocations to these programs and for purposes of emergency response.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Migrant Child Care and Development Programs [10235. - 10238.]

10235.

The department shall administer all migrant child care and development programs. In addition, the department shall support and encourage the state-level coordination of all agencies that offer services to migrant children and their families and state-level coordination of existing health funds for migrants.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10236.

(a) For the purpose of this chapter, a “migrant agricultural worker family” means a family with at least one individual who has earned at least 40 percent of their total gross income from employment in fishing, agriculture, or agriculturally related work during the 12-month period immediately preceding the date of application for childcare and development services.

(b) Children of migrant agricultural worker families shall be enrolled in childcare and development programs on the basis of the following priorities:

(1) The family moves from place to place.

(2) The family has qualified under paragraph (1) within the past five years and is currently dependent for its income on agricultural employment, but is currently settled near agricultural areas.

(3) The family resides in a rural agricultural area and is dependent upon seasonal agricultural
 work.

(4) Eligibility and priority for services for the federally funded Migrant Child Development Program shall be in accordance with the applicable federal regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 459, Sec. 1.   (SB 778)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10236.5.

For the purpose of enrollment in migrant child care and development programs, the department shall ensure that the self certification of income shall be consistent with other child care and development programs under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 459, Sec. 2.   (SB 778)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10237.

The department shall develop appropriate migrant child care and development programs, quality indicators, including those prescribed in subdivisions (a) to (h), inclusive, and (k) to (m), inclusive, of Section 10208, and the following:

(a) Social services.

(1) Bilingual liaison between migrant parents and the center or family child care home, or both.

(2) Liaison between the agency and the relevant community agencies and organizations, including health and social services.

(3) Identification and documentation of family needs and followup referrals as appropriate.

(b) Staffing.

(1) Bilingual health personnel shall be available to each program site of a migrant child care and development agency.

(2) Professional and nonprofessional staff shall reflect the linguistic and cultural background of the children being served.

(3) Whenever possible, migrants will be recruited, trained, and hired in child care and development programs. Documentation of training and career ladder opportunities and of recruitment and hiring efforts shall be provided to the department. Staff training shall include principles and practices of child care and development for the age groups of children being served.

(c) Health services in migrant child care and development programs
 shall include health and dental screening and followup treatment. Health records for all migrant children shall follow the child.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10238.

(a) Cost for migrant programs may exceed the standard reimbursement rate established by the department. In no case shall the reimbursement exceed the cost of the program. State-funded programs may be eligible for Chapter I federal funds to supplement state funding. These funds shall not be contingent upon the provision of additional child days or enrollment.

(b) The department shall annually reimburse seasonal migrant child care and development agencies for approvable startup and closedown costs. Reimbursement for both startup and closedown costs shall not exceed 15 percent of each agency’s total contract amount.

(c) Seasonal migrant child care and development agencies shall
 submit reimbursement claims for startup costs with their first monthly reports, and reimbursement claims for closedown costs with their final reports.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. General Child Care and Development Programs [10240. - 10245.]

10240.

The department, with funds appropriated for this purpose, shall administer general child care and development programs. General child care and development programs shall include:

(a) Age and developmentally appropriate activities for children.

(b) Supervision.

(c) Parenting education and parent involvement.

(d) Social services that include, but are not limited to, identification of child and family needs and referral to appropriate agencies.

(e) Health services.

(f) Nutrition.

(g) Training and career ladder opportunities, documentation of which shall be provided to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10241.

Programs operated pursuant to this part may be designed to meet child-related needs identified by parents or guardians which may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Care for schoolage children during nonschool hours.

(b) Weekend care.

(c) Night shift care.

(d) Worksite care.

(e) Temporary emergency child care.

(f) Child care for ill children.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10242.

(a) (1) Any entity operating child care and development programs funded pursuant to this chapter that provide direct services to children at two or more sites, including through more than one contract or subcontract funded pursuant to this chapter, shall employ a program director.

(2) Programs providing direct services to children, for the purposes of this section, are general child care and development programs pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10240), migrant child care and development programs pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 10235), child care and development services for children with special needs programs pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10260), and any of these
 programs operated through family child care homes.

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(A) “Administrative responsibility” means awareness of the financial and business circumstances of the program, and, in appropriate cases, supervision of administrative and support personnel and the knowledge and authority to direct or modify administrative practices and procedures to ensure compliance to administrative and financial standards imposed by law.

(B) “Program director” means a person who, regardless of their title, has programmatic and administrative responsibility for a child care and development program that provides direct services to children at two or more sites.

(C) “Programmatic
 responsibility” means overall supervision of curriculum and instructional staff, including instructional aides, and the knowledge and authority to direct or modify program practices and procedures to ensure compliance to applicable quality and health and safety standards imposed by law.

(2) Administrative and programmatic responsibility also includes the responsibility to act as the representative for the child development program to the department. With respect to programs operated through family child care homes, administrative and programmatic responsibility includes ensuring that quality services are provided in the family child care homes.

(c) The program director also may serve as the site supervisor at one of the sites, provided that the program director both fulfills the duties of a “child care center director,” as set forth in Section 101215.1 of Title 22 of the
 California Code of Regulations, and meets the qualifications for a site supervisor as set forth in subdivision (aa) of Section 10213.5.

(d) The department may waive the qualifications for program director described in Sections 10380.5 and 10381.5 upon a finding of one of the following circumstances:

(1) The applicant is making satisfactory progress toward securing a permit issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing authorizing supervision of a child care and development program operating in two or more sites or fulfilling the qualifications for program directors in severely disabled programs, as specified in Section 10381.5.

(2) The place of employment is so remote from institutions offering the necessary coursework as to make continuing education impracticable and the contractor has made a diligent search but
 has been unable to hire a more qualified applicant.

(e) The department, upon good cause, may by rule identify and apply grounds in addition to those specified in subdivision (d) for granting a waiver of the qualifications for program director.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10243.

The department shall annually monitor funding used in general childcare and development programs for infants and toddlers and shall annually report to the Department of Finance and to the Legislature a statewide summary identifying the estimated funding used for infants and toddlers. The annual report shall include a comparison to the prior year on a county-by-county basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 13, Sec. 6.   (SB 120)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10244.

(a) The department shall develop and implement a streamlined request for application process for current childcare and development program contractors to award new childcare and development program contracts.

(b) A current childcare and development contractor is ineligible for the streamlined request for application process when one or more of the following conditions apply during a request for application cycle:

(1) The contractor is on conditional status because of fiscal or programmatic noncompliance, as described in Section 18303 or 18304 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) The contractor is
 on provisional status and is applying for additional funding. For purposes of this paragraph, a contractor is considered to be on provisional status if they were awarded a childcare and development contract in the prior year’s childcare and development expansion application cycle, regardless of whether a contract has been executed. A contractor remains on provisional status until they receive a clear contract from the department.
